Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
CHAPTER 276 Railroad Commission — Rates and Service of Common Carriers

276.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

276.020.
Service and facilities of common carriers to be adequate — Rates and practices to be just and reasonable. [Repealed.]

276.030.
Railroad Commission to enforce laws relating to common carriers. [Repealed.]

276.040.
Organization of Railroad Commission — Quorum. [Repealed.]

276.050.
Districts from which railroad commissioners to be elected. [Repealed.]

276.060.
Office of Railroad Commission — Employees — Salaries — Transportation. [Repealed.]

276.070.
Appointments or gifts not to be solicited or accepted by, or offered to, railroad commissioner. [Repealed.]

276.080.
Fees for copies of records of commission. [Repealed.]

276.090.
Annual reports by railroads and express companies to Railroad Commission. [Repealed.]

276.100.
Power of Railroad Commission to secure evidence. [Repealed.]

276.110.
Public disclosure of information obtained by Railroad Commission. [Repealed.]

276.120.
Annual report of Railroad Commission to Governor. [Repealed.]

276.130.
Express companies and carriers by rail to publish, file and display rate schedules. [Repealed.]

276.140.
Written statement of rate to be given on request. [Repealed.]

276.150.
Deviation from rate schedule prohibited — Special contract rates permitted. [Repealed.]

276.160.
Notice of change of rate schedules. [Repealed.]

276.170.
Hearing on proposed change in rate, classification, regulation or practice. [Repealed.]

276.180.
Powers of Railroad Commission as to rates, classifications, regulations and practices of express companies and carriers by water. [Repealed.]

276.190.
Interstate freight rates, duties of Railroad Commission concerning. [Repealed.]

276.200.
Joint rates and traffic agreements — Regulations as to more than one rate, regulation or practice. [Repealed.]

276.210.
Rate control arrangements between carriers by water and other carriers prohibited — One not to own interest in other. [Repealed.]

276.220.
Demurrage charges. [Repealed.]

276.230.
Long and short hauls. [Repealed.]

276.240.
Transportation of passengers free or at reduced rates forbidden — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

276.250.
Record of passenger transportation given free or at reduced rates — Report to Attorney General. [Repealed.]

276.260.
Transportation of property free or at reduced rates by express company or carrier by water forbidden — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

276.270.
Transportation of persons for purpose of intimidating public officers forbidden. [Repealed.]

276.280.
Extortion. [Repealed.]

276.290.
Unjust discrimination. [Repealed.]

276.300.
Undue or unreasonable preference. [Repealed.]

276.310.
Hearings and orders as to extortion. [Repealed.]

276.320.
Hearings and orders as to unjust discrimination or undue or unreasonable preference. [Repealed.]

276.330.
Railroad Commission may hear complaints concerning common carriers or act on own motion. [Repealed.]

276.340.
Form of complaints — Conduct of hearings. [Repealed.]

276.350.
Revocation or modification of orders of Railroad Commission. [Repealed.]

276.360.
Evidentiary effect of award of damages. [Repealed.]

276.370.
Enforcement of award or order — Appeal. [Repealed.]

276.375.
Judicial review of orders of Railroad Commission. [Repealed.]

276.380.
Sheriff to serve summonses and orders of Railroad Commission. [Repealed.]

276.390.
Common carrier statutes are in addition to other laws. [Repealed.]

276.400.
Two railroads using same line to furnish facilities for traffic without discrimination. [Repealed.]

276.410.
Railroad Commission may notify railroad to make repairs or improvements. [Repealed.]

276.420.
Railroads to furnish accommodations for freight and passengers — Checking of baggage. [Repealed.]

276.430.
Waiting rooms — Ticket offices — Notice of delay of train — Announcement of stations and route. [Repealed.]

276.440.
Separate coaches or compartments for white and colored passengers. [Repealed.]

276.450.
Transportation of explosives by carriers — Rules of Railroad Commission governing. [Repealed.]

276.460.
Unclaimed freight, express or baggage, how sold. [Repealed.]

276.470.
Transportation companies to issue bills of lading — Liability for loss of or damage to freight. [Repealed.]

276.480.
Abandonment of passenger service. [Repealed.]

276.490.
Obstructing or interfering with Railroad Commission. [Repealed.]

276.500.
Limitation of prosecutions and actions. [Repealed.]

276.510.
Venue of prosecutions and actions. [Repealed.]

276.530.
Commission’s duty to transmit information concerning abandonment of railroad corridor to Department of Parks and Railtrail Development Office.

The Railroad Commission shall immediately transmit to the Department of Parks and to the Commonwealth’s Railtrail Development Office in the Department for Local Government any information received from a railroad or other person having an ownership interest in a railroad corridor pertaining to a proposed or pending action or proceeding to obtain federal authority for the regulatory abandonment of that railroad corridor.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 338, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 47, § 91, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 117, § 86, effective July 15, 2010.

276.550.
Agreements with Federal Railroad Administration — Approval. [Repealed.]

276.990.
Penalties. [Repealed.]